Utah statutes.
72-6-120.   Department authorized to participate in federal program assuming
responsibility for environmental review of categorically excluded projects --
Rulemaking authority.
(1)  The department may:
(a)  assume responsibilities under 23 U.S.C. Sec. 326 for:
(i)  determining whether state highway design and construction projects are
categorically excluded from requirements for environmental assessments or
environmental impact statements; and
(ii)  environmental review, consultation, or other actions required under
federal law for categorically excluded projects;
(b)  enter one or more memoranda of understanding with the United States
Department of Transportation related to federal highway programs as provided
in 23 U.S.C. Sec. 326 subject to the requirements of Subsection 72-1-207(5);
(c)  accept, receive, and administer grants, other money, or gifts from public
and private agencies, including the federal government, for the purpose of
carrying out the programs authorized under this section; and
(d)  cooperate with the federal government in implementing this section and
any memorandum of understanding entered into under Subsection 72-1-207(5).
(2)  Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in implementing a program
under this section that is approved by the United States Department of
Transportation, the department is authorized to:
(a)  perform or conduct any of the activities described in a memorandum of
understanding entered into under Subsection 72-1-207(5);
(b)  take actions necessary to implement the program; and
(c)  adopt relevant federal environmental standards as the standards for this
state for categorically excluded projects.
(3)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the department may makes rules to implement the provisions of this
section.
